Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [124D.332] COMMUNITY SCHOOLYARDS GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota community schoolyards grant program is established to create park-like outdoor spaces located at elementary or secondary schools that strengthen local ecological systems, provide a wide range of hands-on learning resources, enhance physical and mental health and well-being for students and community members, and foster nature play, recreation, and social opportunities for students and community members. new text end new text begin (b) The purpose of the community schoolyards grant program is to: new text end new text begin (1) make community schoolyards accessible to the broader community outside of school hours; new text end new text begin (2) improve physical activity and mental health opportunities for students and community members; and new text end new text begin (3) incorporate natural landscapes, natural playgrounds, and recreational spaces that promote adaptation, sustainability, resilience, and hands-on learning across subject matters, including science, technology, engineering, arts, and mathematics. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Capital construction and improvement grant program" or "construction program" means the capital construction and improvement grant program that is part of the community schoolyards grant program. new text end new text begin (c) "Community schoolyard" means a park-like outdoor environment located at an elementary or secondary school that strengthens local ecological systems, provides a wide range of hands-on learning resources, enhances physical and mental health and well-being for students and community members, and fosters nature play, recreation, and social opportunities for students and community members. new text end new text begin (d) "Community schoolyards grant program" or "grant program" means the community schoolyards grant program, which consists of two grant program components: new text end new text begin (1) the planning and design grant program established under this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the capital construction and improvement grant program. new text end new text begin (e) "Community-use partner" means a partner that enters into a community-use agreement with an eligible applicant. A community-use partner is either a local government or a school district. new text end new text begin (f) "Eligible applicant" means a local government or a school district and includes an American Indian school as defined in section 124D.73, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (g) "Local government" means a municipality, county, township, Tribal Nation, or a special district. new text end new text begin (h) "Planning and design grant program" or "planning program" means the planning and design grant program that is part of the community schoolyards grant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin The community schoolyards grant program consists of two grant program components: new text end new text begin (1) a planning and design grant program, which awards up to $150,000 to each grant recipient selected by the commissioner for the planning and design of a community schoolyard under subdivision 5; and new text end new text begin (2) a capital construction and improvement grant program, which awards up to $850,000 to each grant recipient selected by the commissioner for the capital construction of a community schoolyard under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Community-use partnership; grant application. new text end new text begin (a) A local government that is an eligible applicant must enter into a community-use agreement with a community-use partner that includes a school or an entire school district. A school district that is an eligible applicant must enter into a community-use agreement with a community-use partner that is a local government. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must review grant applications from eligible applicants. A grant application must contain: new text end new text begin (1) documentation of a community-use agreement between the eligible applicant and a community-use partner that enables the community schoolyard to serve as a community facility outside of school hours. The community-use agreement must include, at a minimum, the following: new text end new text begin (i) a definition of the roles and responsibilities of the eligible applicant and the community-use partner in the operation, use, safety, and maintenance of the community schoolyard; new text end new text begin (ii) a definition of the hours of operation for community use of the community schoolyard; and new text end new text begin (iii) documentation of the community use of the community schoolyard; new text end new text begin (2) documentation of a partnership between the eligible applicant and a community partner organization, such as a nonprofit organization, Tribal Nation, or entity with expertise in outdoor learning spaces or outdoor education spaces, that has experience working with local education providers; new text end new text begin (3) documentation of the amount of matching funds or in-kind contributions that the eligible applicant intends to provide to augment construction program grant money received and the anticipated amount and source of any matching funds or in-kind contributions. The matching fund amounts must be consistent with the requirements in subdivision 7; and new text end new text begin (4) demonstration of the need for a community schoolyard that may use Trust for Public Land's nationally recognized interactive map to help identify the top locations to build a community schoolyard. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Planning and design grant program recipients. new text end new text begin A planning and design grant program recipient must develop a professional plan, design, and construction documents through a community-centered participatory design process in collaboration with students, educators, and community members. The planning and design documents for the community schoolyard must include: new text end new text begin (1) education and health goals, including physical, mental, and social health; new text end new text begin (2) ecological, environmental, and biodiversity goals; new text end new text begin (3) recreation goals; new text end new text begin (4) accessibility, safety, and licensing standards; new text end new text begin (5) the number of students enrolled at each school served by the grant; new text end new text begin (6) the total acreage size of the school property; new text end new text begin (7) the acreage size of the proposed community schoolyard; new text end new text begin (8) a concept plan drawing of the proposed community schoolyard design, which must incorporate design features that create healthy and environmentally sound spaces. Design features may include: new text end new text begin (i) noninvasive trees, plants, and vegetation; new text end new text begin (ii) natural playgrounds, including natural and nature-based elements, including rock gardens, sand boxes, stump logs, streams, living plants, and other features that are integrated with the outdoor landscape and vegetation; new text end new text begin (iii) outdoor classrooms with sitting areas for teachers to lead outdoor lessons; new text end new text begin (iv) traditional and innovative playgrounds designed to encourage gross motor play, collaboration, creative exploration, and joy; new text end new text begin (v) athletic or multipurpose fields; new text end new text begin (vi) stormwater management features; new text end new text begin (vii) walking trails; new text end new text begin (viii) heat mitigation features to protect students from the impact of extreme heat that may include shade structures, increase in tree canopy, spray features, and water fountains; new text end new text begin (ix) pollinator and food gardens; new text end new text begin (x) cultural and interpretative features, such as signs, murals, or sculptures; or new text end new text begin (xi) calm spaces for children; new text end new text begin (9) identification of community partners, including nonprofit organizations and Tribal Nations or entities that have expertise in outdoor learning spaces or outdoor education spaces; and new text end new text begin (10) a plan for the long-term maintenance of the community schoolyard. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Community partner responsibilities. new text end new text begin A community partner organization described in subdivision 4, paragraph (b), clause (2), is encouraged to provide technical assistance to the grant recipient to help facilitate the community-centered participatory design process to plan and design park-like spaces, outdoor learning spaces, or outdoor education spaces with students, educators, and community members according to subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Construction project matching funds. new text end new text begin A proposed community schoolyard construction project that exceeds $500,000 requires, at a minimum, ten percent of the total construction budget available as matching funds at the time of the grant award. A proposed community schoolyard construction project that exceeds $1,000,000 requires, at a minimum, 25 percent of the total construction budget available as matching funds at the time of the grant award. The matching funds may come from state or nonstate resources available to the school or local government for a community schoolyard construction project. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Capital construction and improvement grant program. new text end new text begin An eligible applicant who does not apply for the planning and design grant program may apply to the commissioner for the capital construction and improvement grant program. To be awarded a capital construction and improvement grant, an applicant must include in the application the professional plan, design, and construction documents described in subdivision 5 during the capital construction and improvement grant application period. An eligible applicant must provide evidence that the professional plan, design, and construction documents were created through a community-centered participatory design process in collaboration with students, educators, and community members. An eligible applicant must provide documentation of a community-use agreement with a community-use partner according to subdivision 4, paragraph (b), clause (1). new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Commissioner responsibilities. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, the commissioner must implement a timeline for the community schoolyards grant program that includes: new text end new text begin (1) announcing the planning and design grant and the capital construction and improvement grant; new text end new text begin (2) establishing program requirements, including the application process and timeline for each grant, criteria for application evaluation, and a grant awards process; new text end new text begin (3) accepting and selecting applications from eligible applicants and timely review of applications; new text end new text begin (4) distributing grant money to the grant recipients; and new text end new text begin (5) establishing reporting timelines and requirements for grant recipients. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) A grant recipient must report to the commissioner, at a minimum, any grant money received for planning and design, any grant money received for capital construction and improvement, the number of students affected by a grant award, a description of how the grant money was spent, and after the community schoolyard is completed, the plan for community access and use of the community schoolyard outside of school hours contained in the community-use agreement. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2030, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education finance and policy summarizing the grant recipient reports under paragraph (a). new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMUNITY SCHOOLYARDS GRANT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Community schoolyards grant program. new text end new text begin (a) For the community schoolyards grant program: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of this amount, $....... is for the planning and design grant program and $....... is for the capital construction and improvement grant program. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to $....... of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (d) The base is $....... for fiscal year 2028 and fiscal year 2029. new text end